Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-106 Disapproval of filings.
(a) If, within the waiting period or any extension of the waiting period as
provided in section 431:14-104(j), the commissioner finds that a filing does
not meet the requirements of this article, the commissioner shall send to the
insurer, rating organization, or advisory organization that made the filing,
written notice of disapproval of the filing specifying in what respects the
filing fails to meet the requirements of this article, specifying the
actuarial, statutory, factual, and legal bases for the disapproval, including
an explanation of the application thereof that resulted in disapproval, and
stating that the filing shall not become effective.

(b) If, within thirty days:

(1) After a specific inland marine rate on a risk
specially rated by a rating organization or advisory organization subject to
section 431:14-104(k) has become effective; or

(2) After a special surety or guaranty filing subject
to section 431:14-104(k) has become effective;

the commissioner finds that the filing does not meet
the requirements of this article, the commissioner shall send to the insurer,
rating organization, or advisory organization that made the filing, written
notice of disapproval of the filing specifying in what respects the filing
fails to meet the requirements of this article and stating when, within a
reasonable period thereafter, the filing shall be deemed no longer effective.
The disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued prior to the
expiration of the period set forth in the notice.

(c) If, any time subsequent to the applicable
review period provided for in subsections (a) or (b), the commissioner finds
that a filing does not comply with the requirements of this article, the
commissioner shall order a hearing upon the filing. The hearing shall be held
upon not less than ten days' written notice to every insurer, rating
organization, or advisory organization that made the filing. The notice shall
specify the matters to be considered at the hearing and specify the actuarial,
statutory, factual, and legal bases for the commissioner's finding of
noncompliance. If, after a hearing, the commissioner finds that a filing does
not meet the requirements of this article, the commissioner, within thirty days
of the hearing, shall issue an order specifying in what respects the filing
fails to meet the requirements, and stating when, within a reasonable period
thereafter, the filing shall be deemed no longer effective. Copies of the
order shall be sent to every such insurer, rating organization, or advisory
organization whose filing is affected by the order. The order shall not affect
any contract or policy made or issued prior to the expiration of the period set
forth in the order.

(d) If a filing is disapproved, in whole or in
part, a written request for a hearing may be filed pursuant to section
431:14-118. The insurer shall bear the burden of proving that the filing meets
the requirements of this article.

(e) Any person or organization aggrieved with
respect to any filing that is in effect may make written demand to the
commissioner for a hearing thereon; provided that:

(1) The insurer, rating organization, or advisory
organization that made the filing shall not be authorized to proceed under this
subsection;

(2) The demand shall specify the grounds to be relied
upon by the aggrieved person or organization, and the demand shall show that
the person or organization has a specific economic interest affected by the
filing;

(3) If the commissioner finds that the demand is made
in good faith, that the applicant would be so aggrieved if the person's or
organization's grounds are established, and that the grounds otherwise justify
a hearing, the commissioner, within thirty days after receipt of the demand,
shall hold a hearing. The hearing shall be held upon not less than ten days'
written notice to the aggrieved party and to every insurer, rating
organization, or advisory organization that made the filing. The aggrieved
party shall bear the burden of proving that the filing fails to meet the
standards set forth in section 431:14-103(a)(1); and

(4) If, after the hearing, the commissioner finds
that the filing does not meet the requirements of this article, the
commissioner shall issue an order specifying in what respects the filing fails
to meet the requirements of this article, and stating when, within a reasonable
period, the filing shall be deemed no longer effective. Copies of the order
shall be sent to the applicant and to every such insurer, rating organization,
or advisory organization. The order shall not affect any contract or policy
made or issued prior to the expiration of the period set forth in the order.

(f) No manual of classifications, rules, rating
plan, or any modification of any of the foregoing that establishes standards
for measuring variations in hazards or expense provisions, or both, and that
has been filed pursuant to the requirements of section 431:14-104 shall be
disapproved if the rates thereby produced meet the requirements of this article.

(g) The notices, hearings, orders, and appeals
referred to in this section are in all applicable respects subject to chapter
91, unless expressly provided otherwise. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1990, c
255, §10; am L 2004, c 122, §61; am L 2012, c 258, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next